tex/context/patterns/lang-ru.hyp
% generated by mtxrun --script pattern --convert

% for comment and copyright, see e:/tmp/patterns/lang-ru.rme

% used: а б в г д е ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ы ь э ю я

\hyphenation{
ас-бест
бездн
биз-нес-мен
буй-нак-ске
вбли-зи
взба-ла-муть-ся
вздрем-нешь
во-до-сли-вом
волж-ске
воп-лем
вопль
вост-ра
во-ткать
во-ткем
во-ткешь
во-тку
во-ткут
впол-обо-ро-та
впол-уха
все-во-лож-ске
вцспс
га-рем-но-го
го-ло-дра-нец
грэс
дву-зу-бец
днепр
добре-ем
до-бре-ем-ся
добре-ет
добре-е-те
до-бре-е-тесь
до-бре-ет-ся
добре-ешь
до-бре-ешь-ся
добрею
до-бре-юсь
добре-ют
до-бре-ют-ся
до-бре-сти
до-бро-дят
до-брось
до-брось-те
до-бро-сят
до-бро-шу
домну
доп-пель
драх-му
дрейф-лю
дрейфь-те
еди-но-жды
зав-сек-то-ром
за-мру
за-члись
из-древ-ле
изо-тру
ин-ког-ни-то
искр
ка-за-шек
казнь
кольд-кре-мом
корн-па-пир
ксендз
лик-бе-зом
ло-шадь-ми
людь-ми
лю-э-сом
ма-зу-те
ме-ти-лам
ме-ти-ла-ми
мно-га-жды
морщь-те
на-бе-крень
навз-ничь
на-вскид-ку
на-встре-чу
нагл
на-изусть
на-ис-ко-сок
наи-ме-нее
на-ис-кось
на-обо-рот
на-от-рез
на-супь-ся
на-угад
на-уголь-ник
не-ост-ра
нес-лась
нес-лись
нет-то
не-уду
обидь-ся
обо-шлось
об-ра-сти
од-на-жды
ослаб-ла
ото-мстят
ото-мщу
ото-тру
отру
отрусь
паб-ли-си-ти
па-на-ме
па-на-мец
па-ра-так-сис
пе-ре-вру
пе-ре-ме-жать
пе-ре-ме-жать-ся
пе-ре-шла
пис-чая
по-все-дне-вен
по-гре-мок
по-до-тру
по-ис-ти-не
по-лу-то-ра-ста
по-лу-явью
по-млад-ше
помни
по-мнись
помни-те
по-мни-тесь
по-мно-гу
по-мру
пол-вто-ро-го
пол-шка-фа
по-на-доб-люсь
по-трафь-те
преж-де
прид-ти
при-шла
при-шлось
про-тру
про-хлад-ца
пско-ва
пыл-че
раз-орем-ся
раз-оре-тесь
раз-орет-ся
раз-орешь-ся
разо-тру
ра-зу-мом
резв-люсь
рсфср
сан-узел
сдрейф-лю
се-го-дня
сме-жат
со-блю-сти
со-лжешь
сост-рим
сост-ришь
сост-рю
сост-рят
со-ткать
со-ткем
со-ткешь
сотку
со-ткут
срос-лась
срос-лись
стрем-глав
так-же
тве-ре-зо-го
те-ле-ате-лье
тер-но-сли-вом
троп-лю
тьфу
узу-фрукт
умнем
умнет
умнете
умну
умру
услышь-те
ушла
фо-то-пле-нок
ца-ре-дво-рец
че-рес-чур
чер-но-сли-вом
чресл
чуж-дость
шесть-де-сят
юсом
ядо-зу-бе
ярем-но-го}
